src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON MARJA-I-org
   MARJA-IU-org ;
  
LEXICON MARJA-I-plc 
   MARJA-IU-plc ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-sur
   MARJA-IU-sur ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-ani
   MARJA-IU-ani ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-fem
   MARJA-IU-fem ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-mal
   MARJA-IU-mal ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-obj
   MARJA-IU-obj ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-org
   MARJA-IU-org ;
  
LEXICON MARJA-U-plc 
   MARJA-IU-plc ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-U-sur
   MARJA-IU-sur ;


LEXICON MARJA-IU-ani
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>               MARJADECL-IU  ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-fem
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>               MARJADECL-IU  ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #             ; ! Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-mal
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>               MARJADECL-IU  ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL-IU ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>   MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;
                                  :%>   PLACELASH            ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X4 VUONAT               ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            MARJADECL-IU ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #            ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii



LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
                           ACCRA-DC     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I      ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL    ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
                           ACCRA-DC          ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON MARJADECL-IU ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
                           ACCRA-DC       ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I        ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL      ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE   ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
                           ACCRA-DC          ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I           ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN    ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-LOAN ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
                                   ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X3 ACCRA-I           ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN    ; !
!@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@X5 ACCRA-IICASE ; !

LEXICON MARJA-SHORTGEN  ! Gásakjávrre
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG: K     ; !
      +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub: RHyph ; ! for placenames

LEXICON SUOPMA-plc !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SUOPMA-obj !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SIJTE-mal
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-fem
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            SIJTEDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SIJTE-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH         ;



LEXICON SIJTEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
                                   ACCRA-DC     ; !Nom, Ess
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@W9 ACCRA-I      ; ! Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei
!Dát ii oro doibmamin, go Sijtei lea dovdameahttun lookupis. W9hmm, sáhtá leat konv-feailla.
!Does not work, W9 is commented out in twol.
!NB! Sijtii is norm, Sijtei is SUB, the -ei-illative should just be used in cases like Marie (where it already works)
                                   ACCRA-I      ; !Here, we allow for Illative Sijtii
                                   ACCRA-OBL    ;
                                   ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
                                   ACCRA-DC          ; !Nom, Ess
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@W9 ACCRA-I           ; ! Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei
!Dát ii oro doibmamin, go Sijtei lea dovdameahttun lookupis. W9hmm, sáhtá leat konv-feailla.
!Does not work, W9 is commented out in twol.
!NB! Sijtii is norm, Sijtei is SUB, the -ei-illative should just be used in cases like Marie (where it already works)
                                   ACCRA-I           ; !Here, we allow for Illative Sijtii
                                   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;




LEXICON GUOLBBA-plc ! Place names
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              GUOLBBADECL     ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
           @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell:X4@U.Cap.Opt@   VUONAT          ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-obj ! Object names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> GUOLBBADECL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBADECL
   GUOLBBA-OBL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:X4    K     ;
                  +Ess:X4n   K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8    RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:X4    RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:X2a   K     ; ! MALLAS- but for Prop
       +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X2    K     ; !
             +CmpN/SgG:X2a   RHyph ; !compound also for these
      +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:X2    RHyph ; !compound also for these
               +Sg+Acc:X2a   K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X2    K     ; !
!+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
               +Sg+Ill:X2ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:X2is  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X2in  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:X2ijn K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
!+CmpN/PlG:X2ijd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;


LEXICON ACCRA-DC          ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
   ACCRA-NE ; ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra


LEXICON ACCRA-NE
              +Sg+Nom:  K     ;
            +CmpN/SgN:  RHyph ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:  RProp ;
                 +Ess:n K     ;

LEXICON ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
   ACCRA-NE-LOAN ; ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra


LEXICON ACCRA-NE-LOAN
              +Sg+Nom:  K     ;
            +CmpN/SgN:  RHyph ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:  RProp ;
         +Ess+Use/Sub:n K     ; !


LEXICON ACCRA-I
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
