src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Prefix-Proper
Davveoarje-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:Davve#oarje-Sápmi SUOPMA-plc ;
Davvi-Amerihkká SUOPMA-plc ;
Lulli-Amerihkká SUOPMA-plc ;
Davvi-Ruoŧŧa SUOPMA-plc ;
Lulli-Ruoŧŧa SUOPMA-plc ;
Lulli-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:Lulli-Sápmi SUOPMA-plc ;
Davvi-Suopma+CmpN/SgG:Davvi-Suopma SUOPMA-plc ; !
Mátta-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:Mátta-Sápmi SUOPMA-plc ;
LEXICON ProperNoun
Árktalaš% ráđđi:Árktalaš% ráđđi MARJA-I-org ;
Barentsráđđi:Barents^ráđđi MARJA-I-org ;
Árktalaš% ráđđi+Use/Sub:Arktalaš% ráđđi MARJA-I-org ;
Bassičearru:Bassi^čearru MARJA-U-plc ;
Beatnakvuopmi:Beatnak^vuopmi MARJA-I-plc ;
Bievlajohája:Bievla^joh^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Lávkaávži:Lávka^áv'ži MARJA-I-plc ;
Bossogeailu:Bosso^geaj'lu MARJA-U-plc ;
Bursaája:Bursa^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Bánccu MARJA-U-mal ;
Bárentsčállingoddi:Bárents^čállin^goddi MARJA-I-org ;
Bárentsovttasbargu:Bárents^ovttas^bar'gu MARJA-U-obj ;
Barentsovttasbargu:Barents^ovttas^bar'gu MARJA-U-obj ;
Gálaniitu:Gála^nij'tu MARJA-U-plc ;
Davviriikkaid% Ráđđi:Davvi^riikkaid% Ráđđi MARJA-I-org ;
Doarrobasskáidi:Doarro^bas^skáj'di MARJA-I-plc ;
Doarroája:Doarro^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Duortnoseatnu:Duortnos^eatnu MARJA-U-plc ;
Duottar-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:Duottar-Sápmi SUOPMA-plc ; !
EU-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:EU-Sápmi SUOPMA-obj ; !
Estteeana:Estte^eatnam8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Filbmagoahti:Filbma^goah'ti MARJA-I-org ;
Fuosku:Fuos'ku MARJA-U-plc ;
Geassegieddi:Geasse^gieddi MARJA-I-plc ;
Geatkebasája:Geatke^bas^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Giedderohtu:Giedderoh'tu MARJA-U-plc ;
Goahteája:Goahte^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Gumpejávri:Gumpe^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ;
Girkonjárga-Guovdageaidnu:Girkonjárga-Guovda^geajdnu MARJA-U-plc ;
Gáldu MARJA-U-org ;
Gárjilaguotkku:Gárjila^guotkku MARJA-U-plc ;
Gárppejohguolbba:Gárppe^joh^guol'ban8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Gávpesearvi:Gávpe^sear'vi MARJA-I-org ;
Helgejávri:Helge^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ; !FIN
Iešjotjoavku:Ieš^jot^joav'ku MARJA-U-org ;
Sállanjoavku:Sállan^joav'ku MARJA-U-org ;
Játkánuorri:Játká^nuorri MARJA-I-plc ;
Loabátvahkku:Loabát^vahkku MARJA-U-obj ;
Kruvnnasavu:Kruvnna^savvun8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Láhten-Amerihkká+Use/Sub:Latin-Amerihkká SUOPMA-plc ;
Leahttaseatnu:Leahttas^eatnu MARJA-U-plc ; !FIN
Manasse SIJTE-mal ; !Also sur, but not in our corpus, yet
Marshallduopmu:Marshall^duopmu MARJA-U-obj ;
Meallejávri:Mealle^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ; !FIN
Mjøslávdegoddi:Mjøs^lávde^goddi MARJA-I-org ;
Mohtorsportalihttu:Mohtor^sporta^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Mumistállu:Mumi^stállu MARJA-U-ani ;
Mádiiája:Mádii^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN !sub?
Márju:Már'ju MARJA-U-fem ;
Njullosráhppáidjávri:Njullos^ráhppáid^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ;
Piera-rohke% dállu MARJA-U-plc ; !FIN
Psoriasissearvi:Psoriasis^sear'vi MARJA-I-org ;
Ristenašája:Ristenaš^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Riškavárri:Riška^várri MARJA-I-plc ; !FIN
Ruoŧŧa SUOPMA-plc ;
Saantensiijte:Saanten^siij9te SIJTE-plc ;
Seastinbáŋku:Seastin^báŋ'ku MARJA-U-org ;
Sipmekenjávri:Sipmeken^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ;
Norgga% Sámiid% Riikkasearvi:Norgga% Sámiid% Riikka^sear'vi MARJA-I-org ;
Skadjnjárája:Skadj^njár^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Skirtoláhku:Skirto^láh'ku MARJA-U-plc ;
Smierru MARJA-U-obj ;
Sovjetlihttu:Sovjet^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Spábbačiekčanlihttu:Spábba^čiekčan^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Spábbačiekčanlihttu+Use/Sub:Spábbá^čiekčan^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Stuorradiggi:Stuorra^diggi MARJA-I-org ;
Suopma+CmpN/SgG:Suopma SUOPMA-plc ; !
Suorpmasája:Suorpmas^ád'jag8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Suorroaivi:Suorr^oaj'vi MARJA-I-plc ;
Sámediggeráđđi+Use/Sub:Sáme^digge^ráddi MARJA-I-org ; !
Sámediggi+Use/Sub:Sámi^diggi MARJA-I-org ; !
Sámisoga% lávlla:Sámi^soga% láv'lag8 GUOLBBA-obj ;
Sámi% soga% lávlla:Sámi% soga% láv'lag8 GUOLBBA-obj ;
Sámi% Valáštallan% Lihttu:Sámi% Valá^štallan% Lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Sámi% Válgalihttu:Sámi% Válga^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
Sámi% válgalihttu:Sámi% válga^lihttu MARJA-U-org ;
NRK% Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:NRK% Sápmi MARJA-I-org ;
Teorifágaviessu:Teori^fága^viessu MARJA-U-obj ;
Verddeviessu:Verdde^viessu MARJA-U-org ;
Vuoddagassavu:Vuoddagas^savvun8 GUOLBBA-plc ; !FIN
Vuolledállu:Vuolle^dállu MARJA-U-plc ; !FIN
Vuovde-Sápmi+CmpN/SgG:Vuovde-Sápmi SUOPMA-plc ;
Vuovde-Gearbbetjávri+Use/Sub:Vuovde^gearbbet^jáv'ri MARJA-I-plc ; !
Álgu:Ál'gu MARJA-U-obj ;
Áššu+Use/Sub:Áš'šu MARJA-U-org ;
Čeavrresgáldu:Čeavrres^gál'du MARJA-U-plc ; !FIN
Čieskadasroavvi:Čieskadas^roavvi MARJA-I-plc ; !FIN
